Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5732.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 206. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), each of the following is a residential use of property for the purposes of zoning and a permitted use in all residential zones and is not subject to a special use or conditional use permit or procedure different from those required for other dwellings of similar density in the same zone: (a) A state licensed residential facility. (b) A facility in use as described in section 3(4)(k) of the adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.703. (c) A qualified residential treatment program that provides services for 10 or fewer individuals. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to adult foster care facilities licensed by a state agency for care and treatment of persons released from or assigned to adult correctional institutions. (3) For a county or township, a family child care home is a residential use of property for the purposes of zoning and a permitted use in all residential zones and is not subject to a special use or conditional use permit or procedure different from those required for other dwellings of similar density in the same zone. (4) For a county or township, a group child care home shall must be issued a special use permit, conditional use permit, or other similar permit if the group child care home meets all of the following standards: (a) Is located not closer than 1,500 feet to any of the following: (i) Another licensed group child care home. (ii) An adult foster care small group home or large group home licensed under the adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.701 to 400.737. (iii) A facility offering substance use disorder services to 7 or more people that is licensed or exempt from licensure under part 62 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.6230 to 333.6251. (iv) A community correction center, resident home, halfway house, or other similar facility that houses an inmate population under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. (b) Has appropriate fencing for the safety of the children in the group child care home as determined by the local unit of government. (c) Maintains the property consistent with the visible characteristics of the neighborhood. (d) Does not exceed 16 hours of operation during a 24-hour period. The local unit of government may limit but not prohibit the operation of a group child care home between the hours of 10 p.m. and 6 a.m. (e) Meets regulations, if any, governing signs used by a group child care home to identify itself. (f) Meets regulations, if any, requiring a group child care home operator to provide off-street parking accommodations for his or her the operator's employees. (5) For a city or village, a group child care home may be issued a special use permit, conditional use permit, or other similar permit. (6) A licensed or registered family or group child care home that operated before March 30, 1989 is not required to comply with this section. (7) This section does not prohibit a local unit of government from inspecting a family or group child care home for the home's compliance with and enforcing the local unit of government's zoning ordinance. For a county or township, an ordinance shall must not be more restrictive for a family or group child care home than 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. (8) The establishment of any of the facilities listed under subsection (4)(a) after issuance of a special use permit, conditional use permit, or other similar permit pertaining to the group child care home does not affect renewal of that permit. (9) This section does not prohibit a local unit of government from issuing a special use permit, conditional use permit, or other similar permit to a licensed group child care home that does not meet the standards listed under subsection (4). (10) The distances required under subsection (4)(a) shall must be measured along a road, street, or place maintained by this state or a local unit of government and generally open to the public as a matter of right for the purpose of vehicular traffic, not including an alley. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5729 (request no. H03349'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.